Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 09. State Seal, Flag, and Emblems.

Sec. 44.09.010.
State seal.

The official seal of the State of Alaska is comprised of two concentric circles between which appear the words “The Seal of the State of Alaska” and within the inner circle is the design of the seal corresponding to the representation in this section.

Click to view

History.

(§ 2 ch 141 SLA 1960)

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d, Seals, § 10.

78A C.J.S., Seals, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 44.09.015.
Use of seal without permission prohibited.

A person may not use or make a die or impression of the state seal for any advertising or commercial purpose, unless written permission has first been obtained from the lieutenant governor.

Violation of this section is a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 90 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

11.60.225

. Renumbered in 1978.

Sec. 44.09.017.
Commemorative gold and silver medallions.

The Department of Administration shall contract or otherwise arrange for the minting and sale of Alaska commemorative medallions minted only from .999 fine gold and silver in weights determined by the commissioner of administration. Gold and silver mined in Alaska shall be used in the production of the medallions. The state shall receive a royalty from the sale of the medallions. The amount of the royalty shall be determined by the commissioner of administration.

One side of the commemorative medallions minted under this section shall contain the state seal. The design for the other side shall be determined in an annual contest conducted by the contractor under the supervision of the Department of Administration. Only designs using an Alaska theme and submitted by an Alaska resident may be considered in the contest. Payment for the winning design may not exceed $1,000.

[Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 1988; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994)

Sec. 44.09.020.
State flag.

The design of the official flag is eight gold stars in a field of blue, so selected for its simplicity, its originality, and its symbolism. The blue, one of the national colors, typifies the evening sky, the blue of the sea and of mountain lakes, and of wild flowers that grow in Alaskan soil, the gold being significant of the wealth that lies hidden in Alaska’s hills and streams.

The stars, seven of which form the constellation Ursa Major, the Great Bear, the most conspicuous constellation in the northern sky, contains the stars which form the “Dipper,” including the “Pointers” which point toward the eighth star in the flag, Polaris, the North Star, the ever constant star for the mariner, the explorer, hunter, trapper, prospector, woodsman, and the surveyor. For Alaska the northernmost star in the galaxy of stars represents Alaska, the forty-ninth star in the national emblem.

The flag of the Territory of Alaska is the official flag of the state. The standard proportions and size graphically delineated herein shall be used in the manufacture of the official flag of Alaska. The stars shall be the color of natural yellow gold and the field of blue shall be of the same shade of blue used in the official manufacture of the national emblem of the United States. The design, standard proportions, and size are as follows:

Click to view

History.

(§ 1-1-4 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

The official flag described in this section was the winning design of the flag contest held in 1927 by the American Legion, Department of Alaska, in the public, private, and Native schools of the territory.

Sec. 44.09.030.
Display of flags.

The official flag of the state shall be displayed with the flag of the United States only from sunrise to sunset, or between the hours designated by proper authority. However, the flag may be displayed after sunset upon special occasions when it is desired to produce a patriotic effect.

The flag of the United States and the flag of the State of Alaska shall be displayed daily, weather permitting, in the following places:

on or near the main administration building of every institution under the authority or control of the state government;

in or near every schoolhouse during school days.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 5 SLA 2011.]

When displayed horizontally in a public facility, the flag shall be positioned with the hoist on the left and the North Star in the upper right corner.

When displayed vertically in a public facility, the flag shall be positioned with the hoist at the top and the North Star in the lower right corner.

History.

(§ 1-1-3 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 3 SLA 2007; am §§ 1, 3 ch 5 SLA 2011)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 27, 2011, added (d) and (e) and repealed (c) which read, “An official flag of the state that is no longer a fitting emblem for display because it is worn, tattered, or otherwise damaged may be respectfully retired by fire.”

Sec. 44.09.032.
Folding and presenting the state flag.

When folding the state flag, the following procedure shall be followed, whenever possible:

hold the flag waist-high with another person, so that the flag is parallel to the ground and the hoist is on the left;

fold the flag lengthwise, with the open edge up;

holding the edges securely, rotate the flag so that five stars are facing up;

fold the flag lengthwise a second time, with the open edge up;

holding the edges securely, rotate the flag so that two stars are facing up;

fold the flag widthwise, with the North Star facing down and the hoist on the right;

holding the edges securely, fold the flag widthwise a second time, with the North Star facing down and the hoist on the right;

fold the flag widthwise a third time, with the North Star facing up.

When presenting the folded flag to another person, the folded flag should be turned so that the North Star is nearest the receiver.

History.

(§ 2 ch 5 SLA 2011)

Sec. 44.09.034.
Retirement of the state flag.

An official flag of the state that is no longer a fitting emblem for display because it is worn, tattered, or otherwise damaged may be respectfully retired by fire in a ceremony or other dignified manner honoring the flag as a fitting emblem for the state. When practicable, retirement of the state flag should occur in a public ceremony under the direction of uniformed personnel representing a state or federal military service or a patriotic society. If a formal ceremony is not practicable, a private ceremony is acceptable.

History.

(§ 2 ch 5 SLA 2011)

Sec. 44.09.040.
State song.

The song “Alaska’s Flag,” with music composed by Elinor Dusenbury and words by Marie Drake, is the official song of the state.
The words of the official song are as follows:

Alaska’s Flag

Eight stars of gold on a field of blue —

Alaska’s flag. May it mean to you

The blue of the sea, the evening sky,

The mountain lakes, and the flow’rs nearby;

The gold of the early sourdough’s dreams,

The precious gold of the hills and streams;

The brilliant stars in the northern sky,

The “Bear” — the “Dipper” — and, shining high,

The great North Star with its steady light,

Over land and sea a beacon bright.

Alaska’s flag — to Alaskans dear,

The simple flag of a last frontier.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 1955)

Sec. 44.09.045.
State motto.

The official motto of the State of Alaska is: North to the Future.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1967)

Sec. 44.09.050.
State flower.

The wild native forget-me-not is the state flower and floral emblem.

History.

(§ 1-1-5 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 44.09.060.
State bird.

The Alaska Willow Ptarmigan (Lagopus lagopus alascensis Swarth) is the official bird of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1955)

Sec. 44.09.070.
State tree.

The Sitka spruce (picea sitchenensis), which is recognized as the most valuable tree species in Alaska and which is found in both national forests of the state, is the official tree of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1962)

Sec. 44.09.075.
State marine mammal.

The bowhead whale is the state marine mammal.

History.

(§ 2 ch 88 SLA 1983)

Sec. 44.09.078.
State land mammal.

The moose (Alces alces) is the state land mammal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 17 SLA 1998)

Sec. 44.09.080.
State fish.

The king salmon (Oncorhynchus tshawytscha) is the official fish of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 20 SLA 1963)

Sec. 44.09.085.
State sport.

Dog mushing is the official sport of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 38 SLA 1972)

Sec. 44.09.090.
State medal for heroism.

The governor is authorized to award a state medal for heroism directly or posthumously to any citizen of the state in recognition of a valorous and heroic deed performed in the saving of a life or for injury or death or threat of injury or death incurred in the service of the state or the citizen’s community or on behalf of the health, welfare, or safety of other persons. The medal shall be awarded by the governor with an appropriate ceremony.

The governor shall make arrangements for the designing of the medal for heroism through a statewide design competition participated in by the school children of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 12 SLA 1965)

Sec. 44.09.095.
North Star Medal.

The governor is authorized to award the North Star Medal directly or posthumously to any peace officer, correctional officer, firefighter, first responder, or member of a volunteer search and rescue group who dies or is seriously injured in the line of duty and has displayed exceptional bravery or heroism while performing those duties.

The governor shall present recipients of the North Star Medal with a ribbon, medal, and citation during a ceremony that may not take place more than once a year. The North Star Medal will be awarded to the recipient or, in the event the recipient is no longer living, to the recipient’s next of kin.

Nominations for the North Star Medal must be submitted to the commissioner of public safety by the highest ranking supervisor in the department or organization of the nominee. After reviewing the nominations, the commissioner of public safety shall submit the name or names of persons recommended for the North Star Medal to the governor for approval.

History.

(§ 1 ch 104 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 104, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on December 10, 2018.

Sec. 44.09.100.
State gem.

Jade is the official state gem.

History.

(§ 1 ch 51 SLA 1968)

Sec. 44.09.110.
State mineral.

Gold is the official state mineral.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1968)

Sec. 44.09.120.
State fossil.

The woolly mammoth (Mammuthus primigenius) is the official state fossil.

History.

(§ 2 ch 31 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For legislative intent, see § 1, ch. 31, SLA 1986, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 44.09.130.
State insect.

The four spot skimmer dragonfly is the official state insect.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1995)

Sec. 44.09.140.
State dog.

The Alaskan Malamute is the official state dog.

History.

(§ 1 ch 17 SLA 2010)

Sec. 44.09.150.
State bolt-action rifle.

The pre-1964 Winchester Model 70 bolt-action rifle in the following calibers is the official state bolt-action rifle: .22 Hornet, .220 Swift, .243 Winchester, .250-3000 Savage, .264 Winchester Magnum, .257 Roberts, .270 W.C.F., 7 mm, .300 Savage, .30-06, .300 H&H Magnum, .300 Winchester Magnum, .308 Winchester, .358 Winchester, .35 Remington, .375 H&H Magnum, .338 Winchester Magnum, .458 Winchester Magnum.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 100, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, is effective October 26, 2014.